ext/spell/bg_BG.aff
SFX O Y 18
SFX O   е         ето       .
SFX O   е         ия        .
SFX O   е         ията      .
SFX O   й         и         .
SFX O   й         ите       .
SFX O   й         я         .
SFX O   й         ят        .
SFX O   к         ка        .
SFX O   к         кът       .
SFX O   к         ци        .
SFX O   к         ците      .
SFX O   о         овци      .
SFX O   о         овците    .
SFX O   о         ото       .
SFX O   х         си        .
SFX O   х         сите      .
SFX O   х         ха        .
SFX O   х         хът       .

SFX P Y 104
SFX P   а         ат        .
SFX P   а         ейки      .
SFX P   а         ел        .
SFX P   а         ела       .
SFX P   а         елата     .
SFX P   а         ели       .
SFX P   а         елите     .
SFX P   а         елия      .
SFX P   а         елият     .
SFX P   а         ело       .
SFX P   а         елото     .
SFX P   а         ен        .
SFX P   а         ена       .
SFX P   а         ената     .
SFX P   а         ени       .
SFX P   а         ените     .
SFX P   а         ения      .
SFX P   а         еният     .
SFX P   а         ено       .
SFX P   а         еното     .
SFX P   а         ете       .
SFX P   а         ех        .
SFX P   а         еха       .
SFX P   а         ехме      .
SFX P   а         ехте      .
SFX P   а         еше       .
SFX P   а         ещ        .
SFX P   а         еща       .
SFX P   а         ещата     .
SFX P   а         ещи       .
SFX P   а         ещите     .
SFX P   а         ещия      .
SFX P   а         ещият     .
SFX P   а         ещо       .
SFX P   а         ещото     .
SFX P   а         и         .
SFX P   а         ил        .
SFX P   а         ила       .
SFX P   а         илата     .
SFX P   а         или       .
SFX P   а         илите     .
SFX P   а         илия      .
SFX P   а         илият     .
SFX P   а         ило       .
SFX P   а         илото     .
SFX P   а         им        .
SFX P   а         ите       .
SFX P   а         их        .
SFX P   а         иха       .
SFX P   а         ихме      .
SFX P   а         ихте      .
SFX P   а         иш        .
SFX P   я         ейки      .
SFX P   я         ел        .
SFX P   я         ела       .
SFX P   я         елата     .
SFX P   я         ели       .
SFX P   я         елите     .
SFX P   я         елия      .
SFX P   я         елият     .
SFX P   я         ело       .
SFX P   я         елото     .
SFX P   я         ен        .
SFX P   я         ена       .
SFX P   я         ената     .
SFX P   я         ени       .
SFX P   я         ените     .
SFX P   я         ения      .
SFX P   я         еният     .
SFX P   я         ено       .
SFX P   я         еното     .
SFX P   я         ете       .
SFX P   я         ех        .
SFX P   я         еха       .
SFX P   я         ехме      .
SFX P   я         ехте      .
SFX P   я         еше       .
SFX P   я         ещ        .
SFX P   я         еща       .
SFX P   я         ещата     .
SFX P   я         ещи       .
SFX P   я         ещите     .
SFX P   я         ещия      .
SFX P   я         ещият     .
SFX P   я         ещо       .
SFX P   я         ещото     .
SFX P   я         и         .
SFX P   я         ил        .
SFX P   я         ила       .
SFX P   я         илата     .
SFX P   я         или       .
SFX P   я         илите     .
SFX P   я         илия      .
SFX P   я         илият     .
SFX P   я         ило       .
SFX P   я         илото     .
SFX P   я         им        .
SFX P   я         ите       .
SFX P   я         их        .
SFX P   я         иха       .
SFX P   я         ихме      .
SFX P   я         ихте      .
SFX P   я         иш        .
SFX P   я         ят        .

SFX Q Y 93
SFX Q   а         ал        .
SFX Q   а         ала       .
SFX Q   а         алата     .
SFX Q   а         али       .
SFX Q   а         алите     .
SFX Q   а         алия      .
SFX Q   а         алият     .
SFX Q   а         ало       .
SFX Q   а         алото     .
SFX Q   а         ат        .
SFX Q   а         ата       .
SFX Q   а         атата     .
SFX Q   а         ати       .
SFX Q   а         атите     .
SFX Q   а         атия      .
SFX Q   а         атият     .
SFX Q   а         ато       .
SFX Q   а         атото     .
SFX Q   а         ах        .
SFX Q   а         аха       .
SFX Q   а         ахме      .
SFX Q   а         ахте      .
SFX Q   а         е         .
SFX Q   а         ел        .
SFX Q   а         ела       .
SFX Q   а         елата     .
SFX Q   а         ели       .
SFX Q   а         елите     .
SFX Q   а         елия      .
SFX Q   а         елият     .
SFX Q   а         ело       .
SFX Q   а         елото     .
SFX Q   а         ем        .
SFX Q   а         ете       .
SFX Q   а         ех        .
SFX Q   а         еха       .
SFX Q   а         ехме      .
SFX Q   а         ехте      .
SFX Q   а         еш        .
SFX Q   а         еше       .
SFX Q   а         и         .
SFX Q   я         ейки      .
SFX Q   я         ели       .
SFX Q   я         елите     .
SFX Q   я         ен        .
SFX Q   я         ена       .
SFX Q   я         ената     .
SFX Q   я         ени       .
SFX Q   я         ените     .
SFX Q   я         ения      .
SFX Q   я         еният     .
SFX Q   я         ено       .
SFX Q   я         еното     .
SFX Q   я         ете       .
SFX Q   я         еше       .
SFX Q   я         и         .
SFX Q   я         ил        .
SFX Q   я         ила       .
SFX Q   я         илата     .
SFX Q   я         или       .
SFX Q   я         илите     .
SFX Q   я         илия      .
SFX Q   я         илият     .
SFX Q   я         ило       .
SFX Q   я         илото     .
SFX Q   я         им        .
SFX Q   я         ите       .
SFX Q   я         их        .
SFX Q   я         иха       .
SFX Q   я         ихме      .
SFX Q   я         ихте      .
SFX Q   я         иш        .
SFX Q   я         ял        .
SFX Q   я         яла       .
SFX Q   я         ялата     .
SFX Q   я         ялия      .
SFX Q   я         ялият     .
SFX Q   я         яло       .
SFX Q   я         ялото     .
SFX Q   я         ят        .
SFX Q   я         ях        .
SFX Q   я         яха       .
SFX Q   я         яхме      .
SFX Q   я         яхте      .
SFX Q   я         ящ        .
SFX Q   я         яща       .
SFX Q   я         ящата     .
SFX Q   я         ящи       .
SFX Q   я         ящите     .
SFX Q   я         ящия      .
SFX Q   я         ящият     .
SFX Q   я         ящо       .
SFX Q   я         ящото     .
